Arkansas, session 2025, SB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(1)(H), concerning the inclusion
of affirmative action program summaries in the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher
Education Annual Report, is repealed.
(H) Affirmative action programs summaries, § 6-63-103;
*CRH182*
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(2) and (3), concerning the
contents of the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report
biennially and every five (5) years, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Biennially, each even-numbered year:
(A) A financial condition report, § 6-61-222; and
(B) Changes to affirmative action program plans, § 6-63-
103; and
(C) Economic development goals and educational efforts, §
6-61-207; and
(3) Every five (5) years, beginning in 2015:,
(A) Minority retention plans, § 6-61-122; and
(B) Affirmative action program plans, § 6-63-103(c).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-61-141 is repealed.
6-61-141. Duplication of services.
An institution of higher education that has its main campus, satellite
campus, or center located within a twenty-five-mile radius of another main
campus of an institution of higher education shall enter into a written
agreement with that institution of higher education that shall address
duplication of services between the institutions of higher education.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-61-221(d)(2), concerning the inclusion of
reporting of graduates requiring postsecondary remediation within the
Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The reports developed under this section shall be prepared
on or before October 1 each year and include the cost of remediation for each
state-supported institution of higher education, which shall be submitted to
the Division of Higher Education according to standards developed by the
Division of Higher Education and shall include for each state-supported
institution of higher education:
(A) The amount of institutional revenue spent on
remediation;
(B) The total general revenue subsidy spent on
remediation;
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
(C) The total institutional expenditure for remediation;
and
(D) The general revenue percentage of total expenditures
for remediation.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 16, is
repealed.
6-61-1601. Findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There is a need to create and promote a comprehensive energy
summary and report for the state.
(2) The collaboration of all state-supported institutions of
higher education that participate in energy research activities is vital to
ensure an orderly and effective set of data and other research necessary to
promote energy conservation and develop alternative energy sources on a
statewide level.

6-61-1602. Institutional Energy Research Committee — Creation —
Purpose.
(a) The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall coordinate
the efforts of all state-supported institutions that participate in energy
research activities in the development of the Arkansas Energy Summary and
Report.
(b) The Division of Higher Education, in collaboration with state-
supported institutions of higher education that participate in energy
research activities, shall appoint at least one (1) member of the research
faculty at each state-supported institution of higher education that
participates in energy research activities to serve on the Institutional
Energy Research Committee.
(c)(1) The purpose of the committee is to coordinate ongoing energy
research efforts taking place at each state-supported institution of higher
education and create the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report.
(2) The committee shall modify the Arkansas Energy Summary and
Report as necessary to ensure it is updated with the latest energy research
available.

03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
6-61-1603. Arkansas Energy Summary and Report.
(a) The Institutional Energy Research Committee shall create and adopt
the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report that includes without limitation the:
(1) Energy production and usage in Arkansas, including:
(A) Current sources of energy in Arkansas by percentage
and cost;
(B) Current energy demand and percentage of use of each
energy source, including the production capacity of each energy source;
(C) Projected energy use for the next:
(i) Ten (10) years; and
(ii) Twenty (20) years;
(D) Current and projected cost per kilowatt of additional
energy production capabilities for the following energy sources:
(i) Coal;
(ii) Hydroelectric;
(iii) Natural gas;
(iv) Nuclear;
(v) Solar;
(vi) Wind;
(vii) Lignite; and
(viii) Other; and
(E) Environmental challenges and the impact of each energy
source listed in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section;
(2) Energy production capacity compared to projected energy
growth;
(3) Economical methods for additional energy sources into the
market; and
(4) Current and possible tax incentives or governmental policies
to promote an increase in energy production capacity for state energy
consumption or export to other states.
(b) The committee shall submit the Arkansas Energy Summary and Report
and relevant data, research, and findings to the Joint Committee on Energy no
later than July 1, 2014.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
Subchapter 18 — Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network

6-61-1801. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The purpose of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network is to provide a high-speed, fiber-based optical communications
network to higher education and healthcare institutions in Arkansas;
(2) The Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network began as
a collaboration between Arkansas public colleges and universities in 2005
with an initial investment from state funds;
(3) State positions and funds have been appropriated for the
Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network through the University of
Arkansas system since 2007; and
(4) Since 2007, the University of Arkansas system has provided
administrative support to the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to formally codify the
Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network as a state entity.

6-61-1802. Purpose — Users.
(a) The Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network is a public
instrumentality that provides a high-speed, fiber-based optical
communications network and other technology resources to participating higher
education and healthcare institutions in the state.
(b) Users of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network
services shall be billed at rates to be determined by the Board of Directors
of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network.

6-61-1803. Board of directors — Creation.
(a) There is created the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Research
Education and Optical Network.
(b) The Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network shall be
governed by a board of directors consisting of seven (7) voting members or
designees, as follows:
(1) The President of the University of Arkansas system;
(2) The President of the Arkansas State University system;
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
(3) One (1) at-large member selected by a majority vote of the
current user institutions, who shall serve a two-year term;
(4) Two (2) presidents or chancellors of a four-year state-
supported member institution of higher education to be selected by a majority
vote of the current user institutions, who shall serve staggered two-year
terms; and
(5) Two (2) presidents or chancellors of a two-year state-
supported member institution of higher education to be selected by a majority
vote of the current user institutions, who shall serve staggered two-year
terms.
(c)(1) The President of the University of Arkansas system or his or
her designee shall serve as the chair of the board.
(2) The board shall elect as vice-chair a board member who
represents an institution outside of the University of Arkansas system, who
shall serve a one-year term.
(d)(1) Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
(2) An affirmative vote of four (4) members shall be necessary
for any action taken by the board.

6-61-1804. Director — Personnel.
(a)(1) The executive head of the Arkansas Research Education and
Optical Network shall be the Executive Director of the Arkansas Research
Education and Optical Network who shall be appointed by and serve at the
pleasure of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Research Education and
Optical Network.
(2) The executive director shall carry out the day-to-day
affairs of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network subject to the
approval of the board.
(b) All personnel of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network shall be employees of the University of Arkansas system for purposes
of payroll and benefits.
(c) All expenditures of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network shall:
(1) Comply with state procurement laws; and
(2) Follow University of Arkansas system policies and procedures
relating to procurement.
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
(d) This subchapter does not mean that the:
(1) Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network is a campus,
division, or unit of an institution of higher education or any other entity,
including without limitation the University of Arkansas system; or
(2) University of Arkansas system or its member campuses,
divisions, and units are agents or principals of the Arkansas Research
Education and Optical Network.

6-61-1805. Powers and duties.
(a) The Arkansas Research Education and Optical Network shall have the
following duties:
(1) To develop, implement, and maintain a high-speed, fiber-
based optical communications network and associated campus connections for
use by higher education and healthcare institutions in the state;
(2) To lease and own real property necessary to fulfill its
purpose; and
(3) To explore and implement additional cost-effective
technology services and network solutions that would be beneficial to its
users.
(b) The University of Arkansas system and its various institutions
shall provide assistance to the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network as may be agreed upon for the achievement of its purpose.
(c) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas may own and
lease real property on behalf of the Arkansas Research Education and Optical
Network.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-62-314 is amended to read as follows:
6-62-314. Construction project exemption.
The following state-supported institutions of higher education shall be
exempt as allowed by § 19-4-1415(b)(5) for construction projects exceeding
five million dollars ($5,000,000) if they have adopted policies and
procedures in compliance with state law involving the awarding and oversight
of the contracts for design and construction services:
(1) Henderson State University;
(2) Southern Arkansas University;
(3) University of Central Arkansas;
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
(4) National Park College;
(5) Northwest Arkansas Community College State-supported two-
year colleges; and
(6)(5) Arkansas Tech University.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-62-606(b), concerning the review by the
Building Authority Division of transfer and lease agreements, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) In proceeding under this subchapter, it shall not be necessary for
the board to comply with any other laws relating to the procurement,
disposal, or leasing of property, including without limitation laws
concerning the appointment of appraisers in connection therewith, laws
restricting the obligation of funds for construction, and laws dealing with
the improvement of historic structures, except that the transfer and the
lease agreement shall be subject to the review and approval of the Building
Authority Division.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-63-103 is repealed.
6-63-103. Affirmative action programs — Plans — Annual reports.
(a)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare an affirmative action program for the recruitment of African-
Americans and other members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and
for enrollment as students.
(2) Affirmative action plans shall be prepared on a continuing
basis for future five-year periods.
(b)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare annually a summary report on the steps that have been taken to reach
the goals of the plan.
(2) The report shall:
(A) Include information on the progress made by each
institution for the various levels of employment within the institution; and
(B) Be presented in a table format limited to no more than
five (5) pages.
(c) Copies of the five-year plan and annual reports summaries of each
institution of higher education shall be included in the Comprehensive
Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, filed with the Governor, the
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
Division of Higher Education, the president and board of trustees of the
institution, the board of visitors of the institution, if applicable, and the
House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.
(d) In carrying out the affirmative action plans, each institution of
higher education shall provide for a part-time or full-time employee to
assist the institution in the recruitment of African-Americans and other
members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and for enrollment as
students.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-63-321 is amended to read as follows:
6-63-321. Overtime, incentives, and differentials for direct and
indirect unclassified patient care personnel at University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences.
(a) All unclassified positions employed to provide or support patient
care at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences are eligible for
overtime at the rate of one and one-half (1½) times their regular hourly
rate.
(b) In addition to overtime, unclassified direct and indirect patient
care employees scheduled to work shifts outside of normal operating schedules
may be eligible to receive up to twenty-four percent (24%) of the hourly rate
paid as a shift differential.
(c)(1) All unclassified positions employed to provide or support
patient care at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall be
eligible to receive incentive pay not to exceed one and two-tenths (1.2)
times their base hourly rate.
(2) All unclassified employees required to work in specialty
areas shall be eligible to receive up to ten percent (10%) of the hourly rate
paid as a specialty differential while working in such areas.
(d)(1) When overtime, shift differentials, standby pay, incentive pay,
or specialty differentials are provided to employees as stated in this
section, the total may exceed the line item maximum salaries for those
positions.
(2) This section does not apply to the positions of Patient Care
Administrator, Associate Administrator, or Assistant Administrator of Patient
Care.
(e)(1) In addition, the Board of Trustees of the University of
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
Arkansas for Medical Sciences may also make special compensation allowances
available, in such amounts as the board may determine or justify equitable in
view of the current requirements for registered nurses in the Clinical
Programs of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences and the
availability of registered nurses for employment in the Little Rock
metropolitan area.
(2) However, the special compensation allowances approved by the
board for a single individual shall not exceed the state line item maximum by
more than twenty percent (20%) for those positions.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-64-218 is amended to read as follows:
6-64-218. Sale of donated land.
(a) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas may sell any
land donated to the University of Arkansas by individuals.
(b) When the purchase price is paid to the treasurer of the
university, the president and secretary of the board or designee shall
execute a deed conveying the lands to the purchaser.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1415(c)(2), concerning the
requirement for institutions of higher education to submit a summary of
contract amendments to the Legislative Council, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) The institutions of higher education stated in
subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall perform all duties and
responsibilities stated in subdivision (c)(1) of this section under policies
and procedures adopted by their governing boards.
(B) They shall submit a summary of all contract amendments
to the Legislative Council.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 21-3-101(b), concerning reports under the
equal employment hiring program, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Every state department, agency, board, commission, and
institution of higher education and every constitutional officer shall report
to the Legislative Council on June 30 of each year regarding its efforts to
achieve its equal employment hiring program goal.
(2) However, the report required of any institution by § 6-63-
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
103 may be used in lieu of the report required under this subsection and
shall be filed as provided in this subsection.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 21-4-203(12), concerning the definition of
"state agencies" under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(12) “State agencies” means all agencies, departments, boards,
commissions, bureaus, councils, state-supported institutions of higher
education, or other agencies except the following excluded agencies or
positions within agencies:
(A) The elected constitutional officers of this state and
their employees;
(B) The General Assembly and its employees, including
employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative
Audit;
(C) Members of the Supreme Court, members of the Court of
Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, circuit courts, and
prosecuting attorneys, but not including deputy prosecuting attorneys;
(D) The Arkansas Department of Transportation; and
(E) All administrative, academic, or other nonclassified
employees of the stateState-supported institutions of higher education;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 21-4-503 is amended to read as follows:
21-4-503. Applicability of subchapter.
(a) The provisions of §§ 21-4-501 and 21-4-504 apply to:
(1) Employees of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(2) Employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and
(3) Classified employees of state-supported institutions of
higher education; and
(4) Employees of all agencies of this state whether in the
executive, legislative, or judicial branch of government.
(b) The provisions of this section or any amendments to this section
shall not change any employee benefits or agreements established under § 6-
57-103, § 6-58-105, or § 6-59-105.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 21-4-505 is amended to read as follows:
03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182

SB358
21-4-505. Compensation for unused sick leave of nonclassified employees
of state-supported institutions of higher education — Calculation for unused
sick leave.
(a) At its discretion, a state-supported institution of higher
education may compensate a nonclassified an employee of the state-supported
institution of higher education for accumulated unused sick leave by
providing to the nonclassified employee the same compensation for accumulated
unused sick leave provided to a classified employee of the state-supported
institution of higher education under § 21-4-501.
(b) Compensation for accumulated unused sick leave under this section
shall not be used by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in the
calculation of final average compensation under § 24-4-101.
(c) Unused sick leave for nonclassified employees of state-supported
institutions of higher education shall accrue at the same rate as unused sick
leave accrues under § 21-4-207 for classified employees for calculations made
under this section.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 22-2-114(c), concerning exemption from
regulation and supervision of leasing responsibilities by the Building
Authority Division, is amended to read as follows:
(c) This section shall not apply to an institution of higher
education, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas Department of
Transportation, or the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.













03/03/2025 2:59:47 PM CRH182